Utah statutes.
63B-17-401.   Authorizations to acquire or exchange property.

The Legislature intends that:

(1)  the Division of Facilities Construction and Management, acting on behalf of the Department of Natural Resources, may enter into a lease purchase agreement with Uintah County to provide needed space for agency programs in the area;

(2)  the agreement shall involve a trade at fair market value between the Division of Facilities Construction and Management and Uintah County of the following two properties:

(a)  that portion of the current Uintah County complex that is owned by the state, located at 147 East Main Street, Vernal, Utah, which currently houses the Department of Natural Resources and other state agencies; and

(b)  a parcel of land owned by Uintah County, located at approximately 318 North Vernal Avenue, Vernal, Utah, which would become the location of the needed space under the lease purchase agreement;

(3)  before entering into an agreement with Uintah County, the Division of Facilities Construction and Management shall ensure that all other state agencies in the Uintah County complex stay in their current location or receive adequate replacement space, with the terms of any replacement space acceptable to each state agency;

(4)  before entering into an agreement with Uintah County, the Department of Natural Resources shall obtain the approval of the State Building Board;

(5)  the State Building Board may approve the agreement only if the Department of Natural Resources demonstrates that the lease purchase will be a benefit to the state; and

(6)  before entering into an agreement with Uintah County, and after obtaining the approval of the State Building Board, the Department of Natural Resources shall report the terms of the agreement to the legislative Executive Appropriations Committee.

